Massachusetts, session 194th, S2526.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 61 of the acts of 2003 is hereby amended by striking
out the words “wines and malt” and inserting in place thereof the following words: - “all
alcoholic”.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 127 of the acts of 2008 is hereby amended by striking
out the words “wines and malt” and inserting in place thereof the following words: - “all
alcoholic”.
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 101 of the acts of 2015 is hereby amended by striking
out the words “wines and malt” and inserting in place thereof the following words: - “all
alcoholic”.
SECTION 4. No holder of a license granted by the select board of the town of Topsfield
for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises shall sell, offer for sale, or
otherwise distribute alcoholic beverages in containers less than 200 milliliters.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2